Hawaii, session 2026, GM1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. (a) There is established within the office of
the comptroller a five-year office of the state construction
manager pilot program, which shall be headed by a full-time
state construction manager, to provide guidance and
recommendations on the design review of state construction
projects pursuant to this section. The state construction
manager shall be hired by the comptroller without regard to
chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and report to the
comptroller.
(b) To be eligible to serve in the position of state
construction manager, an individual shall have held a valid
license under chapter 464, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for at least
five years immediately preceding the date of hire.
(c) The state construction manager shall not engage in the
private practice of professional construction management or
serve in a managing capacity in any private business or
enterprise.
2026-2503 SB2543 GDI SMA-2.docx 1
imiMniMiiiiiiiiiiiffliiHii

Page 2 S.B. NO.
• h.D. 2
C.D. 1
(d) The salary of the state construction manager shall be
established by the comptroller.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f), the office of
the state construction manager shall provide guidance and
recommendations on the design review of state construction
projects with an estimated design value of $2,000,000 or more
that are administered by the department of accounting and
general services or the department of education and located in
any county with a population of less than five hundred thousand.
The office of the state construction manager shall:
(1) Review all plans, drawings, specifications, and any
other documents necessary for state construction
projects, and ensure the final plans, drawings,
specifications, and other documents reviewed are
submitted to the disability and communication access
board for review to ensure compliance with any
applicable accessibility laws as required under
section 103-50, Hawaii Revised Statutes; provided that
any changes to the final plans, drawings,
specifications, or other documents shall require
2026-2503 SB2543 GDI SMA-2.docx 2
IIIIIIIIIIIBIIIIIMOIIIIIH

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
resubmittal to the disability and communication access
board for review;
(2) Provide exclusive centralized design review services
for state construction projects subject to this
section;
(3) Assign an inspector to each eligible state
construction project for the purpose of observing the
construction work.; and
(4) Assign employees to the department of public works of
each applicable county who shall have the sole
responsibility for reviewing and approving permit
applications submitted for state construction projects
administered by the department of accounting and
general services or the department of education in the
respective county. The county agencies under this
paragraph shall not assign any other work to these
employees.
(f) The department of education may opt into the pilot
program for specific complex projects and shall not be required
to subject all of its capital improvement projects to the review
process set forth in subsection (e).
2026-2503 SB2543 CDl SMA-2.docx 3
imiigHiiMioiiiiiiniiiwi

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(g) The cost of all design review services performed by
the office of the state construction manager for a state agency
shall be determined by the comptroller, in consultation with the
state construction manager.
S (h) All fees collected pursuant to subsection (g) shall be
deposited with the comptroller to the credit of the design
review special fund established by subsection (i).
(i) There is established in the state treasury the design
review special fund to be administered and expended by the
comptroller for the purposes of this Act, into which shall be
deposited:
(1) Fees collected for services provided to state agencies
pursuant to this section;
(2) Appropriations made by the legislature to the special
fund; and
(3) Interest earned or accrued on moneys in the special
fund.
Moneys remaining on balance in the design review special
fund at the close of each fiscal year shall remain in the
special fund and shall not lapse to the credit of the state
2026-2503 SB2543 GDI SMA-2.docx
iDiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiimgniMiii

Page 5 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
general fund until after the dissolution of the office of the
state construction manager pilot program.
No funds appropriated to the department of education for
operating expenses or capital improvements shall be diverted or
used to finance or support the design review special fund.
(j) No later than December 31, 2027, the comptroller, in
consultation with the state construction manager, shall adopt
rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to
implement this section.
(k) The office of the state construction manager shall
prepare and submit an annual report on the office of the state
construction manager pilot program to the governor and
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular sessions of 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031. The
report shall include:
(1) A summary describing the activities of the office of
the state construction manager, including but not
limited to a list and description of each state
construction project that received a design review
during the preceding fiscal year;
2026-2503 SB2543 CDl SMA-2.docx
liiiogiiiinniiliiiiiiniiini

Page 6 S.B. NO.
"'2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) A financial report on the status of the design review
special fund established by subsection (i);
(3) An assessment of whether the pilot program should be
extended; and
(4) Other findings and recommendations, including any
proposed legislation.
(1) The office of the state construction manager pilot
program shall be dissolved on June 30, 2031.
(m) As used in this section:
"State agency" means the department of accounting and
general services and the department of education.
"State construction project" means any undertaking of work
or improvement of state lands or any interest therein,
developed, acquired, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated,
improved, altered, or repaired by a state agency.
"State lands" means all lands owned by the State through
any state agency.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,034,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
implementation of the office of the state construction manager
2026-2503 SB2543 CDl SMA-2.docx
liiiHiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiinMi

Page 7
S.B. NO.
"’2
CD. 1
pilot program established pursuant to section 1 of this Act,
including the establishment of:
(1) One full-time equivalent (1,0 FTE) state construction
manager position within the office of the comptroller;
and
(2) Five full-time equivalent (5.0 FTE) positions within
the office of the state construction manager,
including three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE)
positions to be assigned to applicable county
agencies.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2503 SB2543 CDl SMA-2.docx
IIHIIiMllilllllBIliWnUM

2543
S.B. NO
S.
H.
C.
Q
Q
Q
CM
CM
■<-
APPROVED this 24th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 2543, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
231-26

SB No. 2543, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives